Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Senatorial Districts

5.100.
Division of Commonwealth into senatorial districts.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky is divided into thirty-eight (38) senatorial districts as provided by KRS

5.101

to

5.138

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 39, effective January 8, 1992.

5.101.
First Senatorial District.

The First Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Calloway KY

County: Crittenden KY

County: Fulton KY

County: Graves KY

County: Hickman KY

County: Lyon KY

County: Trigg KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, §
5, effective January 1, 1993; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
1, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
1, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 101, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 1, effective January 21, 2022.

5.102.
Second Senatorial District.

The Second Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Ballard KY

County: Carlisle KY

County: Livingston KY

County: Marshall KY

County: McCracken KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
2, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
2, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 102, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 2, effective January 21, 2022.

5.103.
Third Senatorial District.

The Third Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Caldwell KY

County: Christian KY

County: Muhlenberg KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 3, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, §
6, effective January 1, 1993; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
3, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
3, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 103, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 3, effective January 21, 2022.

5.104.
Fourth Senatorial District.

The Fourth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Henderson KY

County: Hopkins KY

County: Union KY

County: Webster KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
4, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
4, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 104, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 4, effective January 21, 2022.

5.105.
Fifth Senatorial District.

The Fifth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Breckinridge KY

County: Butler KY

County: Grayson KY

County: Meade KY

County: Ohio KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 5, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
5, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
5, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 105, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 5, effective January 21, 2022.

5.106.
Sixth Senatorial District.

The Sixth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

E182 - Precinct 182 32 District

F172 - Precinct 172 33 District

F179 - Precinct 179 33 District

F181 - Precinct 181 33 District

F182 - Precinct 182 33 District

F185 - Precinct 185 33 District

F186 - Precinct 186 33 District

F187 - Precinct 187 33 District

S118 - Precinct 118 48 District

S125 - Precinct 125 48 District

S126 - Precinct 126 48 District

S128 - Precinct 128 48 District

S130 - Precinct 130 48 District

S131 - Precinct 131 48 District

S132 - Precinct 132 48 District

S135 - Precinct 135 48 District

S141 - Precinct 141 48 District

S142 - Precinct 142 48 District

S143 - Precinct 143 48 District

S144 - Precinct 144 48 District

S146 - Precinct 146 48 District

S150 - Precinct 150 48 District (part)

211110103093010, 211110103094000, 211110103094001, 211110103094002, 211110103094003, 211110103094005, 211110103094006, 211110103094007, 211110103094008, 211110103094009

Click to view

S153 - Precinct 153 48 District

S156 - Precinct 156 48 District

S161 - Precinct 161 48 District

County: Oldham KY

County: Trimble KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 6, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
6, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
6, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 106, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 6, effective January 21, 2022.

5.107.
Seventh Senatorial District.

The Seventh Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Anderson KY

County: Henry KY

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B151 - Precinct 151 29 District

B154 - Precinct 154 29 District

B157 - Precinct 157 29 District

B158 - Precinct 158 29 District

B159 - Precinct 159 29 District

B161 - Precinct 161 29 District

B162 - Precinct 162 29 District

B168 - Precinct 168 29 District

B170 - Precinct 170 29 District

B177 - Precinct 177 29 District (part)

211110116032007, 211110116032008, 211110116032009, 211110116032043, 211110116032044, 211110116032045, 211110116032046, 211110117093010, 211110117094000

Click to view

B182 - Precinct 182 29 District

D122 - Precinct 122 31 District (part)

211110111105002, 211110111105008, 211110111105009, 211110111105010, 211110111105011

Click to view

D126 - Precinct 126 31 District

D137 - Precinct 137 31 District (part)

211110111106006, 211110111106007

Click to view

D142 - Precinct 142 31 District (part)

211110111105003, 211110111105004

Click to view

V101 - Precinct 101 36 District (part)

211110115172000, 211110115172001, 211110115172004, 211110115175000, 211110115175001, 211110115175002, 211110115175007

Click to view

V103 - Precinct 103 36 District

V105 - Precinct 105 36 District (part)

211110116041031, 211110116041032, 211110116041037, 211110116041038, 211110116041039, 211110116041040, 211110116041041, 211110116041043, 211110116041044, 211110116041045, 211110116042000, 211110116042001, 211110116042002, 211110116042003, 211110116042004, 211110116042005, 211110116042006, 211110116042007, 211110116042011

Click to view

V106 - Precinct 106 36 District (part)

211110115171006, 211110115171009, 211110115172002, 211110115172003, 211110115174000, 211110115174001

Click to view

V107 - Precinct 107 36 District (part)

211110116041000, 211110116041001, 211110116041002, 211110116041003, 211110116041004, 211110116041042, 211110116041046, 211110116041047, 211110116041048, 211110116041049, 211110116041050, 211110116041051, 211110116041052, 211110116061050, 211110116061051, 211110116061052, 211110116061053, 211110116061054, 211110116061055, 211110116061056, 211110116061057, 211110116061058, 211110116061059, 211110116061060, 211110116061061, 211110116061062

Click to view

County: Shelby KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 7, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
7, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
7, effective January 11, 1996; 2000, ch. 325, § 1, effective June 15, 2000; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 107, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 7, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 7, effective January 21, 2022.

5.108.
Eighth Senatorial District.

The Eighth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Daviess KY

County: Hancock KY

County: McLean KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 8, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
8, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
8, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 108, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 8, effective January 21, 2022.

5.109.
Ninth Senatorial District.

The Ninth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Barren KY

County: Edmonson KY

County: Green KY

County: Hart KY

County: Warren KY (part)

A103 - Municipal Park (part)

212270106001012, 212270106001014, 212270106001018, 212270106001019, 212270106001020, 212270106001021, 212270106001022, 212270106001023, 212270106001024, 212270106001025, 212270106001026, 212270106001027, 212270106001028, 212270114012027, 212270114012028

Click to view

A104 - Potter Gray (part)

212270106001010, 212270106001011, 212270106001015

Click to view

A114 - Hartland (part)

212270114012025

Click to view

B101 - B.G. Towers (part)

212270101001000, 212270101001001, 212270101001002, 212270101001003, 212270101001004, 212270101001005, 212270101001006, 212270101001007, 212270101001008, 212270101001009, 212270101001010, 212270101001011, 212270101001012, 212270101001018, 212270101002000, 212270101002001, 212270101002002, 212270101002003, 212270101002004, 212270101002005, 212270101002006, 212270101002007, 212270101002008, 212270101002009, 212270101002010, 212270101002011, 212270101002012, 212270101002013, 212270101002014, 212270101002015, 212270101002016, 212270101002017, 212270101002018, 212270101002019, 212270101002020, 212270101002021, 212270102001002, 212270102001003, 212270102001004, 212270102001005, 212270102001006, 212270102001007, 212270102001008, 212270102001009, 212270102001010, 212270102001011, 212270102001012, 212270102001013, 212270102001023, 212270102001024, 212270102001025, 212270102001026, 212270102001027, 212270102001031, 212270102001033, 212270102002016, 212270102002020, 212270104001002

Click to view

B102 - West 11th Street (part)

212270102003027, 212270102003028, 212270102003037, 212270102003038, 212270103001001, 212270103001002, 212270103001003, 212270103001004, 212270103001005, 212270103001006, 212270103001010, 212270103001011, 212270103001012, 212270103001013, 212270103001014, 212270103001015, 212270103001016, 212270103001017, 212270103001019, 212270103001020, 212270103001021, 212270103001022, 212270103001023, 212270103001024, 212270103002001, 212270103002002, 212270103002003, 212270103002004, 212270103002010, 212270103002011, 212270103002012, 212270103002018, 212270103002019, 212270103002020, 212270103002021, 212270103002022, 212270112001010

Click to view

B103 - Hillview

B106 - Reels

B107 - Greenmeadows

B108 - Octagon Castle

B109 - Fairview (part)

212270101001013, 212270101001014, 212270101001015, 212270102001014, 212270102001015, 212270102001016, 212270102001017, 212270102001018, 212270102001019, 212270102001020, 212270102001021, 212270102001022, 212270102001028, 212270102001029, 212270102001030, 212270102001032, 212270102001034, 212270102001035, 212270102001036, 212270102001037, 212270102001038, 212270102001039, 212270102001040, 212270102001041, 212270102001042, 212270105002000, 212270105002001, 212270105002002, 212270105002003, 212270105002004, 212270105002005, 212270105002006, 212270105002007, 212270105002008, 212270105002009, 212270105002013, 212270105002021, 212270105002022, 212270105002023, 212270105002024, 212270105002038, 212270105002039

Click to view

B110 - Broadway (part)

212270101001016, 212270101001017, 212270101001019, 212270101001020, 212270101001021, 212270101001022, 212270101001023, 212270101001024, 212270105002010, 212270105002011, 212270105002012, 212270105002014, 212270105002015, 212270105002016, 212270105002017, 212270105002018, 212270105002019, 212270105002020, 212270105002025, 212270105002026, 212270105002027, 212270105002029, 212270105002042, 212270105002043, 212270105002044, 212270105002045

Click to view

B111 - Central

B112 - Stonehenge

B113 - Jennings

B114 - Douglas

B115 - Valleyview

B202 - 17-2-2

B203 - 17-2-3

B204 - 17-2-4

B205 - 17-2-5

E101 - Blue Level (part)

212270111001000, 212270111001001, 212270111001002, 212270111001003, 212270111001004, 212270111001005, 212270111001006, 212270111001007, 212270111001008, 212270111001009, 212270111001010, 212270111001011, 212270111001012, 212270111001013, 212270111001014, 212270111001015, 212270111001016, 212270111001017, 212270111001018, 212270111001019, 212270111001020, 212270111001021, 212270111001023, 212270111001024, 212270111001025, 212270111001026, 212270111001027, 212270111001028, 212270111001029, 212270111001042, 212270111001043, 212270111001048, 212270111004000, 212270111004003, 212270118022000, 212270118022001, 212270118022002, 212270118022003, 212270118022004, 212270118022005, 212270118022006, 212270118022007, 212270118022008, 212270118022038, 212270118022039, 212270118022040, 212270118022068

Click to view

E102 - Sandhill

E103 - Richardsville (part)

212270102004001, 212270102004003, 212270102004006, 212270102004025, 212270113001000, 212270113001001, 212270113001002, 212270113001003, 212270113001004, 212270113001005, 212270113001006, 212270113001007, 212270113001008, 212270113001010, 212270113001022, 212270118011004, 212270118011005, 212270118011006, 212270118011011, 212270118011012, 212270118011013, 212270118011020, 212270118011023, 212270118011024, 212270118011025, 212270118011026, 212270118011030, 212270118011031, 212270118011032, 212270118011033

Click to view

E104 - Davenport (part)

212270112002000, 212270112002001, 212270112004000, 212270112004001, 212270112004002, 212270112004003, 212270112004004, 212270112004005, 212270112004006, 212270112004007, 212270112004008, 212270112004009, 212270112004010, 212270112004011, 212270112004012, 212270112004013, 212270112004014, 212270112004016, 212270112004017, 212270112004019, 212270112004020, 212270112004021, 212270112004022, 212270112004027, 212270118013004, 212270118013005, 212270118013006, 212270118013007, 212270118013008, 212270118013009, 212270118013010, 212270118013040, 212270118013041, 212270118013044, 212270118013045, 212270118013046, 212270118013047, 212270118013048, 212270118013049, 212270118013050, 212270118013051, 212270118013052, 212270118013053

Click to view

E105 - Riverside

E106 - Browning

E107 - Cedar Grove

E108 - Hadley

E110 - Millers

E111 - Whispering Hills

E112 - Springhill

E113 - Res-Care

E201 - 19-5-1

E203 - 19-5-3

E204 - 19-5-4

E205 - 19-5-5

E206 - 19-5-6

E208 - 19-5-8

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 9, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
9, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
9, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 109, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 9, effective January 21, 2022.

5.110.
Tenth Senatorial District.

The Tenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Hardin KY

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A130 - Precinct 130 28 District

O142 - Precinct 142 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 10, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
10, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
10, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 110, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 10, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 10, effective January 21, 2022.

5.111.
Eleventh Senatorial District.

The Eleventh Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

A102 - Belleview

A103 - Bullittsville

A104 - Burlington #1

A105 - Burlington #2

A106 - Carlton

A107 - Constance

A108 - Hebron #1

A109 - Hebron #2

A110 - Petersburg

A111 - Burlington #3

A112 - Burlington #4

A113 - Burlington #5

A114 - Hebron #3

A115 - Burlington #6

A116 - Burlington #7

A117 - Hebron #4

A119 - Limaburg

A120 - Burlington #8

A121 - Hebron #5

A122 - Burlington #9

A123 - Camp Ernst

B115 - Glenview

B116 - Greenview

B117 - Hopeful

B118 - Linkview

B119 - Oakbrook

B120 - Pleasant Valley

B122 - Union #1

B123 - Union #2

B124 - Union #3 (part)

210150706051001, 210150706051002, 210150706051003, 210150706051004, 210150706051005, 210150706051006

Click to view

B125 - Union #4

B129 - Union #5

B130 - Union #6

B131 - Summitview

B132 - Hearthstone

B133 - Florence #15

B135 - Union #7

C102 - Devon #1

C117 - Devon #3

C121 - Shamrock

C123 - Airport

C124 - Florence #1

C125 - Florence #2

C126 - Florence #3

C127 - Florence #4

C128 - Florence #5

C129 - Florence #6

C130 - Florence #7

C131 - Florence #8

C132 - Florence #9

C133 - Florence #10

C134 - Florence #11

C135 - Florence #12

C136 - Florence #13

C137 - Florence #14

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 11, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
11, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
11, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 111, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 11, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 11, effective January 21, 2022.

5.112.
Twelfth Senatorial District.

The Twelfth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyle KY

County: Fayette KY (part)

A103 - Beaumont

A138 - The Colony

A157 - Harrods Hill

A158 - Armory

A166 - Twin Oaks

A167 - Pasadena (part)

210670029003001, 210670029003003, 210670029003004, 210670029003010, 210670029003011, 210670029003012, 210670029003013

Click to view

A176 - Sungale

A182 - Ashbrooke

A188 - Dunbar

A192 - Cardinal Run

A193 - Hemingway

B101 - Clemens Hts.

B104 - Brigadoon

B117 - Keithshire

B129 - Monticello

B130 - Open Gates

B133 - Cedar Run

B141 - Stone

B142 - Stonewall

B150 - Robinwood

B156 - Bayswater

B159 - Southview

B163 - Plantation

B172 - Shillito (part)

210670042041016, 210670042041017, 210670042041028, 210670042041029, 210670042041030, 210670042041042, 210670042041043, 210670042041044, 210670042041045, 210670042041048, 210670042042000, 210670042042014, 210670042043014, 210670042043015, 210670042043016, 210670042043017, 210670042043018, 210670042101000, 210670042101001

Click to view

B183 - Cave Hill

B184 - Palomar

B185 - Scenicview

B186 - Glenview

B187 - Stone Creek

B191 - Waverly

B192 - Palmetto

B199 - Indian Hills

B200 - White Pine

B201 - Harrods View

B203 - Wyndsong

B205 - Blackhorse

B208 - English Station

B212 - Bay Meadows

B213 - Beaver Place

B215 - Copper Creek

B216 - Foleys Trail

B219 - Lee Adams

B222 - Wellington Gardens

B223 - Willow Oak

B226 - Hollyberry

County: Mercer KY

County: Woodford KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 12, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
12, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
12, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 112, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 12, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 12, effective January 21, 2022.

5.113.
Thirteenth Senatorial District.

The Thirteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A101 - Alexandria

A106 - Cardinal Valley

A109 - Douglas-Washington

A111 - Fairlawn

A113 - Garden Springs

A114 - Gibson Park

A117 - Hampton Court

A118 - Holiday Hills

A121 - Keys

A123 - Lane Allen

A131 - Oxford

A132 - Pine Meadows

A133 - Preston Inn

A136 - Skycrest

A139 - Turfland

A140 - Versailles Rd

A143 - West Main

A145 - Wolf Run

A146 - Triangle Park

A148 - Alabama

A149 - Aspendale-Bluegrass

A150 - Campsie

A151 - Clays Mill

A155 - Ohio-Walnut

A156 - Pershing

A161 - Coolavin

A163 - Fairgrounds

A167 - Pasadena (part)

210670029003000, 210670029003002

Click to view

A169 - Castlewood

A170 - Meadow Lane

A171 - Northern

A172 - Warfield Place

A173 - Imperial

A174 - Arlington

A177 - Phoenix Park

A178 - Caywood

A180 - Beaumont Centre

A181 - Headley Green

A184 - Bunker

A185 - Lawrence

B102 - Barkley

B105 - Brookhaven

B108 - Deerfield

B110 - Fairway

B112 - Glendover

B113 - Goodrich

B114 - Hill-N-Dale

B118 - Lafayette

B119 - Laketower

B120 - Lansdowne

B121 - Leawood

B123 - Ecton Park

B125 - Malabu

B127 - Merrick

B128 - Chinoe

B132 - Picadome

B135 - Seven Parks

B137 - Shadeland

B138 - Shady Lane

B139 - Clays Spring

B147 - Zandale

B151 - Blairmore

B152 - Edgewater

B158 - Park Hills

B166 - Lakeview

B167 - Gray Hawk

B168 - Montavesta

B181 - Taborlake

B182 - Montclair

B188 - Castlegate

B197 - Aqueduct

B229 - Complex

C103 - Ashland Avenue

C105 - Aylesford

C113 - Chevy Chase

C115 - Clifton

C120 - Duke

C124 - Fontaine

C126 - Kingswood

C128 - Hollywood

C129 - Idle Hour

C130 - Julia R Ewan

C132 - Johnson Heights

C137 - Rookwood

C138 - Victory

C140 - Walton

C142 - Woodland

C143 - Woodspoint

C144 - Alsab

C148 - Delaware

C150 - Winter Garden

C156 - Patchen Village

C157 - Richmond Rd.

C167 - Rio Dosa

C170 - Breckinridge

C171 - Groves Point

C189 - Saddlebrook

C191 - Plainview

C195 - Liberty Station

C221 - Ridgebrook

C226 - Burkewood

C231 - Rockminster

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 13, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
13, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
13, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 113, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 13, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 13, effective January 21, 2022.

5.114.
Fourteenth Senatorial District.

The Fourteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Larue KY

County: Marion KY

County: Nelson KY

County: Spencer KY

County: Washington KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 14, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
14, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
14, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 112, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 14, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 14, effective January 21, 2022.

5.115.
Fifteenth Senatorial District.

The Fifteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Clinton KY

County: Cumberland KY

County: Pulaski KY

County: Russell KY

County: Wayne KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 15, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
15, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
15, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 115, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 15, effective January 21, 2022.

5.116.
Sixteenth Senatorial District.

The Sixteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Adair KY

County: Allen KY

County: Metcalfe KY

County: Monroe KY

County: Taylor KY

County: Warren KY (part)

A101 - Peachtree (part)

212270114022025

Click to view

A103 - Municipal Park (part)

212270114012024

Click to view

A104 - Potter Gray (part)

212270106001003, 212270106001005, 212270106001006, 212270106001007, 212270106001008, 212270106001009, 212270106001013, 212270106001016, 212270106001017, 212270114012000, 212270114012005, 212270114012006, 212270114012015, 212270114012037, 212270114014006, 212270114014007, 212270114014013, 212270114014014

Click to view

A107 - Briarwood

A110 - Eastwood

A111 - Airport

A112 - Middle Bridge (part)

212270107011000, 212270107011001, 212270107011002, 212270107011003, 212270107011004, 212270107011005, 212270107011021, 212270114011063, 212270114022023, 212270114022024

Click to view

A114 - Hartland (part)

212270114012016, 212270114012019, 212270114012020, 212270114012021, 212270114012022, 212270114012023, 212270114012026, 212270114012033, 212270114012035, 212270114012036, 212270114012039

Click to view

A116 - Steeplechase

A117 - Wrenwood

A118 - Mooreland

A201 - 19-1-1

A202 - 19-1-2

A203 - 19-1-3

A204 - 19-1-4

A205 - 19-1-5

B101 - B.G. Towers (part)

212270102001000, 212270102001001, 212270102002014, 212270102002015

Click to view

B102 - West 11th Street (part)

212270102003024, 212270102003026

Click to view

B104 - Church Street

B105 - Delafield

B109 - Fairview (part)

212270106001000, 212270106001001, 212270106001002, 212270106001004, 212270114013027, 212270114013028, 212270114013029, 212270114013030

Click to view

D101 - Smiths Grove

D102 - Plum Springs

D103 - Hydro

D104 - Oakland

D105 - Gott

D106 - Warren East Middle Sch

D107 - Three Forks

D108 - Mt Victor

D109 - Cumberland Trace

D110 - Hillside

D111 - Northgate

D112 - Riverview

D113 - Bristow

D114 - Countryside

D115 - Smith

D116 - Fruit of The Loom

D201 - 20-4-1

D202 - 20-4-2

D203 - 20-4-3

D204 - 20-4-4

D206 - 20-4-6

D207 - 20-4-7

E103 - Richardsville (part)

212270113001020, 212270113001021

Click to view

E104 - Davenport (part)

212270102004023, 212270102004035, 212270102004037, 212270112004018

Click to view

E109 - Meadowland

F110 - Hardcastle

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 16, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
16, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
16, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 116, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 16, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 16, effective January 21, 2022.

5.117.
Seventeenth Senatorial District.

The Seventeenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A104 - Bell School House

A116 - Trailside

A183 - Silver Creek (part)

210670037031006, 210670037031017, 210670037041013, 210670037041018, 210670037041019, 210670037041020, 210670037041021, 210670037041022, 210670037041023, 210670037041024, 210670037041025, 210670037041026

Click to view

A187 - Town Branch

A189 - Westmorland

A190 - Greenway

A194 - Majestic View

A196 - Stallion Run

A197 - Valley Brook

A198 - Whiteberry

A204 - Locust Blossom (part)

210670037012027

Click to view

County: Grant KY

County: Kenton KY (part)

B101 - Bracht (part)

211170637012005, 211170637012006, 211170637012007, 211170637012008, 211170637012009, 211170637012011, 211170637012012, 211170637012020, 211170637012025, 211170637012026, 211170637012027, 211170637012028, 211170637012029, 211170637012030, 211170637012031, 211170637012032, 211170637012033, 211170637012034, 211170637012035, 211170637012041, 211170637012042, 211170637012043, 211170637012044, 211170637012045, 211170637012046, 211170637012047, 211170637012048

Click to view

B105 - Decoursey (part)

211170659002006, 211170659002009, 211170659002017, 211170659002027

Click to view

B115 - Independence #1

B116 - Independence #2

B118 - Independence #4

B119 - Morningview

B120 - Nicholson #1 (part)

211170637011044, 211170637011045

Click to view

B121 - Nicholson #2

B123 - Piner

B125 - Erlanger #11 (part)

211170636043009, 211170636043011

Click to view

B129 - Visalia

B130 - Whites Tower

B131 - Independence #5

B132 - Independence #6 (part)

211170658001000, 211170658001015, 211170658001020, 211170658001021, 211170658001022, 211170658001023, 211170658001025, 211170658001026, 211170658002000, 211170658002001, 211170658002002, 211170658002013, 211170658002016, 211170658002017, 211170658002027, 211170659002010, 211170659002011, 211170659002012, 211170659002013, 211170659002014, 211170659002016, 211170668022000, 211170668022001, 211170668022002, 211170668022003, 211170668022004, 211170668022005, 211170668022006, 211170668022007, 211170668022008, 211170668022009, 211170668022010, 211170668022011, 211170668022012, 211170668022013

Click to view

B133 - Independence #7

B136 - Independence #9

B137 - Independence #10 (part)

211170636092015, 211170636093008, 211170636093015, 211170636093016, 211170636093019, 211170636093021, 211170636102001, 211170636102002, 211170636102003, 211170636102004, 211170636102005, 211170636102006, 211170636102007, 211170636102008, 211170636102009

Click to view

B140 - Independence #11

County: Scott KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 17, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
17, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
17, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 117, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 17, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 17, effective January 21, 2022.

5.118.
Eighteenth Senatorial District.

The Eighteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyd KY

County: Carter KY

County: Greenup KY

County: Lewis KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 18, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
18, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
18, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 118, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 18, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 18, effective January 21, 2022.

5.119.
Nineteenth Senatorial District.

The Nineteenth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B124 - Precinct 124 29 District

B132 - Precinct 132 29 District

B133 - Precinct 133 29 District

B156 - Precinct 156 29 District

B160 - Precinct 160 29 District

B185 - Precinct 185 29 District

C115 - Precinct 115 30 District

C122 - Precinct 122 30 District

C123 - Precinct 123 30 District

C124 - Precinct 124 30 District

C125 - Precinct 125 30 District

C126 - Precinct 126 30 District

C128 - Precinct 128 30 District

C129 - Precinct 129 30 District

C130 - Precinct 130 30 District

C131 - Precinct 131 30 District

C133 - Precinct 133 30 District

C134 - Precinct 134 30 District

C135 - Precinct 135 30 District

C136 - Precinct 136 30 District

C137 - Precinct 137 30 District

C138 - Precinct 138 30 District

C139 - Precinct 139 30 District

C141 - Precinct 141 30 District

C142 - Precinct 142 30 District

C144 - Precinct 144 30 District

C145 - Precinct 145 30 District

C146 - Precinct 146 30 District

C147 - Precinct 147 30 District

C148 - Precinct 148 30 District

C149 - Precinct 149 30 District

C150 - Precinct 150 30 District

C151 - Precinct 151 30 District

D101 - Precinct 101 31 District

D104 - Precinct 104 31 District

D106 - Precinct 106 31 District

D110 - Precinct 110 31 District

D113 - Precinct 113 31 District

D129 - Precinct 129 31 District

D130 - Precinct 130 31 District

D131 - Precinct 131 31 District

D136 - Precinct 136 31 District

D144 - Precinct 144 31 District

D145 - Precinct 145 31 District

G108 - Precinct 108 34 District

G109 - Precinct 109 34 District

G111 - Precinct 111 34 District

G112 - Precinct 112 34 District

G116 - Precinct 116 34 District

G117 - Precinct 117 34 District

G119 - Precinct 119 34 District

G120 - Precinct 120 34 District

G121 - Precinct 121 34 District

G122 - Precinct 122 34 District

G123 - Precinct 123 34 District

G124 - Precinct 124 34 District

G126 - Precinct 126 34 District

G129 - Precinct 129 34 District

G142 - Precinct 142 34 District

G143 - Precinct 143 34 District

G144 - Precinct 144 34 District

G145 - Precinct 145 34 District

G146 - Precinct 146 34 District

G147 - Precinct 147 34 District

G148 - Precinct 148 34 District

G149 - Precinct 149 34 District

G151 - Precinct 151 34 District

G154 - Precinct 154 34 District

G155 - Precinct 155 34 District

G156 - Precinct 156 34 District

G157 - Precinct 157 34 District

G158 - Precinct 158 34 District

G159 - Precinct 159 34 District

G160 - Precinct 160 34 District

G161 - Precinct 161 34 District

G162 - Precinct 162 34 District

G166 - Precinct 166 34 District

G167 - Precinct 167 34 District

G168 - Precinct 168 34 District

H102 - Precinct 102 35 District

H103 - Precinct 103 35 District

H105 - Precinct 105 35 District

H106 - Precinct 106 35 District

H109 - Precinct 109 35 District

H110 - Precinct 110 35 District

H111 - Precinct 111 35 District

H112 - Precinct 112 35 District

H113 - Precinct 113 35 District

H114 - Precinct 114 35 District

H115 - Precinct 115 35 District

H116 - Precinct 116 35 District

H117 - Precinct 117 35 District

H118 - Precinct 118 35 District

H120 - Precinct 120 35 District

H121 - Precinct 121 35 District

H133 - Precinct 133 35 District

H141 - Precinct 141 35 District

H148 - Precinct 148 35 District

H150 - Precinct 150 35 District

H151 - Precinct 151 35 District

H152 - Precinct 152 35 District

H153 - Precinct 153 35 District

H156 - Precinct 156 35 District

H157 - Precinct 157 35 District

H159 - Precinct 159 35 District

K129 - Precinct 129 40 District

K134 - Precinct 134 40 District

M144 - Precinct 144 42 District

M145 - Precinct 145 42 District

M159 - Precinct 159 42 District

M160 - Precinct 160 42 District

M165 - Precinct 165 42 District

Q107 - Precinct 107 46 District

Q109 - Precinct 109 46 District

Q115 - Precinct 115 46 District

Q125 - Precinct 125 46 District

Q131 - Precinct 131 46 District

Q132 - Precinct 132 46 District

Q139 - Precinct 139 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 19, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
19, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
19, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 119, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 19, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 19, effective January 21, 2022.

5.120.
Twentieth Senatorial District.

The Twentieth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

A118 - Hamilton

B114 - Beaver

B121 - Richwood

B124 - Union #3 (part)

210150706051009, 210150706072001, 210150706072002, 210150706072003, 210150706072005, 210150706072011, 210150706072012, 210150706072013, 210150706072014

Click to view

B126 - Verona

B127 - Walton #1

B128 - Walton #2

B134 - Kensington

C110 - Devon #2

County: Carroll KY

County: Franklin KY

County: Gallatin KY

County: Kenton KY (part)

B101 - Bracht (part)

211170637011019, 211170637011020, 211170637011021, 211170637011022, 211170637011023, 211170637011024, 211170637011025, 211170637011026, 211170637011027, 211170637011028, 211170637011029, 211170637011030, 211170637011031, 211170637011032, 211170637011036, 211170637011037, 211170637011038, 211170637011039, 211170637011040, 211170637011041, 211170637011042, 211170637011043, 211170637012000, 211170637012001, 211170637012002, 211170637012003, 211170637012010, 211170637012013, 211170637012014, 211170637012015, 211170637012016, 211170637012017, 211170637012018, 211170637012019, 211170637012021, 211170637012022, 211170637012023, 211170637012024, 211170637012049, 211170637012055, 211170637012056

Click to view

B117 - Independence #3

B120 - Nicholson #1 (part)

211170636092029, 211170636092030, 211170636092031, 211170636092032, 211170636092033, 211170636092034, 211170636092037, 211170636092038, 211170636092039, 211170636092040, 211170636093009, 211170636093010, 211170636093011, 211170636093017, 211170636093018, 211170636093020, 211170637011000, 211170637011001, 211170637011002, 211170637011003, 211170637011004, 211170637011005, 211170637011006, 211170637011007, 211170637011008, 211170637011009, 211170637011010, 211170637011011, 211170637011012, 211170637011013, 211170637011014, 211170637011015, 211170637011016, 211170637011017, 211170637011018, 211170637011033, 211170637011034, 211170637011035, 211170637011046

Click to view

B134 - Independence #8

B137 - Independence #10 (part)

211170636093012

Click to view

B141 - Nicholson #3

County: Owen KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 20, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
20, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
20, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 120, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 20, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 20, effective January 21, 2022.

5.121.
Twenty-first Senatorial District.

The Twenty-first Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Casey KY

County: Laurel KY

County: Lincoln KY

County: Rockcastle KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 21, effective January 8, 1992; 1994, ch. 497, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
21, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
21, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 121, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 21, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 21, effective January 21, 2022.